New Jersey, session 221, S389.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 12 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-60) is amended to read as follows: 12.  a. Simultaneously with the starting date for the implementation of retail choice as determined by the board pursuant to subsection a. of section 5 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-53), the board shall permit each electric public utility and gas public utility to recover some or all of the following costs through a societal benefits charge that shall be collected as a non-bypassable charge imposed on all electric public utility customers and gas public utility customers, as appropriate: (1)   The costs for the social programs for which rate recovery was approved by the board prior to April 30, 1997.  For the purpose of establishing initial unbundled rates pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-52), the societal benefits charge shall be set to recover the same level of social program costs as is being collected in the bundled rates of the electric public utility on the effective date of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-49 et al.). The board may subsequently order, pursuant to its rules and regulations, an increase or decrease in the societal benefits charge to reflect changes in the costs to the utility of administering existing social programs.  Nothing in P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-49 et al.) shall be construed to abolish or change any social program required by statute [or] , board order [or] , rule , or regulation to be provided by an electric public utility.  Any [such] social program shall continue to be provided by the utility until otherwise provided by law, unless the board determines that it is no longer appropriate for the electric public utility to provide the program, or the board chooses to modify the program; (2)   Nuclear plant decommissioning costs; (3)   [The costs of demand side management programs that were approved by the board pursuant to its demand side management regulations prior to April 30, 1997.  For the purpose of establishing initial unbundled rates pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-52), the societal benefits charge shall be set to recover the same level of demand side management program costs as is being collected in the bundled rates of the electric public utility on the effective date of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-49 et al.).  Within four months of the effective date of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-49 et al.), and every four years thereafter, the board shall initiate a proceeding and cause to be undertaken a comprehensive resource analysis of energy programs, and within eight months of initiating such proceeding and after notice, provision of the opportunity for public comment, and public hearing, the board, in consultation with the Department of Environmental Protection, shall determine the appropriate level of funding for energy efficiency, plug-in electric vehicles and plug-in electric vehicle charging infrastructure, and Class I renewable energy programs that provide environmental benefits above and beyond those provided by standard offer or similar programs in effect as of the effective date of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-49 et al.); provided that the funding for such programs be no less than 50 percent of the total Statewide amount being collected in electric and gas public utility rates for demand side management programs on the effective date of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-49 et al.) for an initial period of four years from the issuance of the first comprehensive resource analysis following the effective date of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-49 et al.), and provided that 25 percent of this amount shall be used to provide funding for Class I renewable energy projects in the State.  In each of the following fifth through eighth years, the Statewide funding for such programs shall be no less than 50 percent of the total Statewide amount being collected in electric and gas public utility rates for demand side management programs on the effective date of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-49 et al.), except that as additional funds are made available as a result of the expiration of past standard offer or similar commitments, the minimum amount of funding for such programs shall increase by an additional amount equal to 50 percent of the additional funds made available, until the minimum amount of funding dedicated to such programs reaches $140,000,000 total.  After the eighth year the board shall make a determination as to the appropriate level of funding for these programs.  Such programs shall include a program to provide financial incentives for the installation of Class I renewable energy projects in the State, and the board, in consultation with the Department of Environmental Protection, shall determine the level and total amount of such incentives as well as the renewable technologies eligible for such incentives which shall include, at a minimum, photovoltaic, wind, and fuel cells. The board shall simultaneously determine, as a result of the comprehensive resource analysis, the programs to be funded by the societal benefits charge, the level of cost recovery and performance incentives for old and new programs and whether the recovery of demand side management programs' costs currently approved by the board may be reduced or extended over a longer period of time.  The board shall make these determinations taking into consideration existing market barriers and environmental benefits, with the objective of transforming markets, capturing lost opportunities, making energy services more affordable for low income customers and eliminating subsidies for programs that can be delivered in the marketplace without electric public utility and gas public utility customer funding] (Deleted by amendment, P.L. , c.    (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill); (4)   Manufactured gas plant remediation costs, which shall be determined initially in a manner consistent with mechanisms in the remediation adjustment clauses for the electric public utility and gas public utility adopted by the board; and (5)   The cost, of consumer education, as determined by the board, which shall be in an amount that, together with the consumer education surcharge imposed on electric power supplier license fees pursuant to subsection h. of section 29 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-78) and the consumer education surcharge imposed on gas supplier license fees pursuant to subsection g. of section 30 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-79), shall be sufficient to fund the consumer education program established pursuant to section 36 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-85). b.    There is established in the Board of Public Utilities a nonlapsing fund to be known as the "Universal Service Fund."  The board shall determine: the level of funding and the appropriate administration of the fund; the purposes and programs to be funded with monies from the fund; which social programs shall be provided by an electric public utility as part of the provision of its regulated services which provide a public benefit; whether the funds appropriated to fund the "Lifeline Credit Program" established pursuant to P.L.1979, c.197 (C.48:2-29.15 et seq.), the "Tenants' Lifeline Assistance Program" established pursuant to P.L.1981, c.210 [(C.48:2-29.31 et seq.)] (C.48:2-29.31 et seq.), the funds received pursuant to the Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. s.8621 et seq., and funds collected by electric and [natural] gas public utilities, as authorized by the board, to offset uncollectible [electricity] electric and [natural] gas public utility bills should be deposited in the fund; and whether new charges should be imposed to fund new or expanded social programs. (cf: P.L.2019, c.362, c.13) 2.    Section 13 of P.L.2007, c.340 (C.48:3-98.1) is amended to read as follows: 13.  a.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law [or] , rule [or] , order, or regulation to the contrary: (1)   an electric public utility or a gas public utility may provide and invest in energy efficiency and conservation programs in its respective service territory on a regulated basis pursuant to this section, regardless of whether the energy efficiency or conservation program involves facilities on the utility side or customer side of the point of interconnection; (2)   an electric public utility or a gas public utility may invest in Class I renewable energy resources, or offer Class I renewable energy programs on a regulated basis pursuant to this section, regardless of whether the renewable energy resource is located on the utility side or customer side of the point of interconnection; and (3)   the board may provide funding for energy efficiency, conservation, and renewable energy improvements through the [societal benefits charge established pursuant to section 12 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-60), the] retail margin on certain hourly-priced and larger non-residential customers pursuant to the board's continuing regulation of basic generation service pursuant to sections 3 and 9 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-51 and C.48:3-57) [,] or other monies appropriated for such purposes.  The board may also direct electric public utilities and gas public utilities to undertake energy efficiency, conservation, and renewable energy improvements, and shall allow the recovery of program costs and incentive rate treatment pursuant to subsection b. of this section. b.    An electric public utility or a gas public utility seeking cost recovery for any program pursuant to this section shall file a petition with the board to request cost recovery. In determining the recovery by electric public utilities and gas public utilities of program costs for any program implemented pursuant to this section, the board may take into account the potential for job creation from such programs, the effect on competition for such programs, existing market barriers, environmental benefits, and the availability of such programs in the marketplace.  Unless the board issues a written order within 180 days after the filing of the petition approving, modifying or denying the requested recovery, the recovery requested by the utility shall be granted effective on the 181st day after the filing without further order by the board.  Ratemaking treatment may include placing appropriate technology and program cost investments in the respective utility's rate base, or recovering the utility's technology and program costs through another ratemaking methodology approved by the board [, including, but not limited to, the societal benefits charge established pursuant to section 12 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-60)]. All electric public utility and gas public utility investment in energy efficiency and conservation programs or Class I renewable energy programs may be eligible for rate treatment approved by the board, including a return on equity, or other incentives or rate mechanisms that decouple utility revenue from sales of electricity and gas. c.     Within 120 days after the date of enactment of P.L.2007, c.340 (C.26:2C-45 et al.), the board shall issue an order that allows electric public utilities and gas public utilities to offer energy efficiency and conservation programs, to invest in Class I renewable energy resources, and to offer Class I renewable energy programs in their respective service territories on a regulated basis.  The board's order shall be reflected in rules and regulations thereafter to be adopted by the board pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.). d.    As used in this section: "Class I renewable energy program" means any regulated program approved by the board pursuant to this section for the purpose of facilitating the development of Class I renewable energy in the State. "Energy efficiency and conservation program" means any regulated program, including customer and community education and outreach, approved by the board pursuant to this section for the purpose of conserving energy or making the use of electricity or natural gas more efficient by New Jersey consumers, whether residential, commercial, industrial, or governmental agencies. "Program costs" means all reasonable and prudent costs incurred in developing and implementing energy efficiency, conservation, or Class I renewable energy programs approved by the board pursuant to this section.  These costs shall include a full return on invested capital and foregone electric and gas distribution fixed cost contributions associated with the implementation of the energy efficiency, conservation, or Class I renewable energy programs until those cost contributions are reflected in base rates following a base rate case if such costs were reasonably and prudently incurred. (cf: P.L.2007, c.340, s.13) 3.    Section 1 of P.L.2007, c.101 (C.54:50-39) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  A department or agency of State government, including independent authorities and instrumentalities of the State, shall, as a precondition to the award of business assistance or incentive or as a component of the application for business assistance or incentive as appropriate, require a person to submit a tax clearance certificate issued by the director prior to the department or agency making an award of business assistance or incentive to the person. b.    The person applying for business assistance or incentive may apply to the director for a tax clearance certificate and shall provide the director such information in [such] the form as the director may prescribe necessary for the director to determine if the person has satisfied all requirements for filing those State tax and information returns and for paying those State taxes for which they have been liable as taxpayers or as collectors of tax. c.     If the director determines that the person has complied with all requirements for filing tax and information returns and for paying or remitting required State taxes and fees, the director shall issue to the person a tax clearance certificate. If the director determines that the person has not filed all required tax and information returns or has not paid all tax, penalties, interest, or fees due, the director shall issue a notice of delinquency or deficiency listing unfiled returns or balances due. The director may require a person to resolve all delinquencies and deficiencies before a tax clearance certificate is issued, or upon review of the total circumstances, the director may issue an interim tax clearance certificate if the director determines to the director's satisfaction that the person will resolve all [such] delinquencies or deficiencies within the time period specified by the director. The director's issuance of a regular or interim tax clearance certificate shall not constitute a waiver of authority to demand resolution of all deficiencies and delinquencies and shall not prevent further audit or the assessment of additional taxes, penalties, interest, or fees as may be provided by law.  No additional right to protest or appeal the State tax indebtedness, filing deficiency, or penalties shall be available to any person pursuant to this section. d.    As used in this section: "Business assistance or incentive" means monetary or financial assistance in any form, other than a tax credit or tax exemption granted pursuant to a claim made on a tax return filed with the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury, including but not limited to a grant, loan, loan guarantee, or other monetary or financial benefit awarded to a person by a department or agency of State government, including independent authorities and instrumentalities of the State, to assist the person in the conduct or operation of a business, occupation, trade, or profession in the State, in connection with the following programs: (1) the business employment incentive program established pursuant to P.L.1996, c.26 (C.34:1B-124 et al.); (2) the business retention and relocation assistance program established pursuant to P.L.1996, c.25 (C.34:1B-112 et seq.); (3) the customized training services provided pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1992, c.43 (C.34:15D-5), except for assistance provided to a person pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.2001, c.152 (C.34:15D-21); (4) [the business, commercial and industrial components of the clean energy program administered by the Board of Public Utilities] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.    (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill); (5) the business grant, loan, and loan guarantee programs administered by: (a) the New Jersey Economic Development Authority; (b)   the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency; and (c)   the Casino Reinvestment Development Authority; (6)   the science and technology grants provided by or through the New Jersey Commission on Science and Technology; and (7) any other similar State program that confers a significant monetary or financial benefit upon a business or businesses, as prescribed by the State Treasurer pursuant to regulations promulgated pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), except for assistance provided to a person pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.2001, c.152 (C.34:15D-21). e.     The director may charge and collect an application fee from a person applying for a tax clearance certificate, to reflect the administrative costs, and may charge and collect a reasonable service fee for the provision of any expedited services offered. f.     In order to better manage the workload of issuing tax clearance certificates, the director may prescribe a schedule by which tax clearance certificates will initially be issued for only one or more of the programs enumerated as business assistance or incentive, or one or more of the components of one or more of those programs, and by which tax clearance certificate issuance for other programs enumerated, or other components of those programs, will be instituted beginning on dates specified according to the schedule. In prescribing the schedule the director will give due regard to the monetary value of the assistance and incentive offered, the timing of the application process, the number of applicants, and necessary applicant and program administrator notice for a particular program or program component.  [Such a] The schedule adopted by the director shall be subject to change by the director, but in any case shall provide for issuance of tax clearance certificates for all enumerated programs before January 1, 2009. Notwithstanding any provisions of this section to the contrary, no tax clearance certificate shall be required as a precondition to the award of business assistance or incentive or as a component of the application for business assistance or incentive prior to its program's, or its program's component's, scheduling by the director pursuant to this subsection. g.    Notwithstanding any provision of the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) to the contrary, the director may adopt immediately upon filing with the Office of Administrative Law such regulations as the director deems necessary to implement the provisions of this act, which shall be effective for a period not to exceed 180 days following enactment of P.L.2007, c.101 (C.54:50-39) and may thereafter be amended, adopted, or readopted by the director in accordance with the requirements of the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.). (cf: P.L.2009, c.199, s.4) 4.    The following sections are repealed: Section 1 of P.L.2011, c.126 (C.48:3-60.2); and Section 1 of P.L.2011, c.216 (C.48:3-60.3). 5.    This act shall take effect immediately.